Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-522
Central data registry; department; duties; use of data.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall establish and maintain a central data registry for the collection and storage of reported data concerning inherited or congenital infant or childhood-onset diseases. The department shall use reported data to ensure that all infants born in the State of Nebraska are tested for diseases set forth in section 71-519 or by rule and regulation. The department shall also use reported data to evaluate the quality of the statewide system of newborn screening and develop procedures for quality assurance. Reported data in anonymous or statistical form may be made available by the department for purposes of research.

Laws 1987, LB 385, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 505;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 87;

Laws 2002, LB 235, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 18;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 393;

Laws 2017, LB91, § 3.
July 1, 2018